West Virginia, session 2025, SB54.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION. §18-2-9b. Requiring age-appropriate instruction on the Holocaust. In collaboration with and utilizing guidance from the West Virginia Commission on Holocaust Education established pursuant to §5-28-1 et seq. of this code, all public schools located within this state shall give age-appropriate instruction on the Holocaust, the systematic, planned annihilation of European Jews and other groups by Nazi Germany, a watershed event in the history of humanity, to be taught in a manner that leads to an investigation of human behavior, and an examination of what it means to be a responsible and respectful person: Provided, That this instruction may not be given before grade six. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home